West Virginia, session 2025, SB285.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 5. county board of education. §18-5-52. Public school West Virginia Guardian Program. (a) Purpose. — County boards of education may contract with an independent contractor who is an honorably discharged veteran, former state trooper, former municipal police officer, former deputy sheriff, or former federal law-enforcement officer to provide West Virginia Guardian services as that term is defined in this section. The purpose of the contract is to provide public safety and/or security on public school grounds and buildings. Any county board of education may contract with as many independent contractors as the county school board considers necessary. (b) Definitions. — For purposes of this section, the following words have the following meanings: "Contract" means an agreement between a county board of education and an independent contractor relating to the procurement of public safety or security services.  "County school board" means the same as that term is used in §18-5-1 et seq. "Independent contractor" means the same as that term is used in §21-5I-4. "Public safety or security" means the protection of students, faculty, and staff of a public school from violence, bullying, theft, substance abuse, the sale or use of illegal substances, exposure to weapons, and threats on school grounds.  "Former deputy sheriff" means the same as that term is used in §7-14C-1, but who has retired from service."Former municipal police officer" means an individual previously employed as a member of a police department by a West Virginia municipality or municipal subdivision, and who has retired from service;"Former state trooper" means a state police officer employed pursuant to the provisions of §15-2-1 et seq., and who has retired pursuant to the provisions of §15-2-27. "Former federal law-enforcement officer" means a federal law-enforcement officer employed pursuant to the provisions of §15-10-5(b), who was classified as an 1811 Investigator, and who has retired from service.  "Honorably discharged veteran" means an honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States, reserve, or National Guard."West Virginia Guardian" means an independent contractor under contract to a county school board for the purposes of providing public safety and/or security on school grounds. Persons contracted to provide these services shall include an honorably discharged veteran, a former state trooper, a former municipal police officer, a former deputy sheriff, or a former federal law-enforcement officer. A West Virginia Guardian is considered an authorized individual for purposes of the Gun-Free School Zones Act of 1990, 18 U.S.C. §921 and §922. (c) Authority. — Notwithstanding the provisions of §61-7-11a or any applicable rule, an independent contractor acting as a West Virginia Guardian may carry a concealed weapon upon meeting all the requirements of this section.  A West Virginia Guardian is not law enforcement and may not arrest. They are to provide public safety and security to protect life and property as set forth in this section, including, but not limited to, detention of individuals as may be necessary pending the arrival of law enforcement.(d) Requirements for participation. — Prior to entering into a contract with a West Virginia Guardian, the county school board shall require an applicant to provide proof that he or she: (1) Is a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state of West Virginia; (2) Has received a high school diploma or a General Educational Development diploma known as a GED; (3) Has met and passed all the requirements for a concealed carry permit as set forth in §61-7-4; (4) Has completed and passed all the following training courses and examinations: (A) The Law Enforcement Professional Standards program at the West Virginia State Police. The cost of this program shall be paid by the independent contractor; (B) A fitness for duty examination that shall include a physical examination, vision examination, a psychiatric examination, and a pre-employment drug screen. The cost of these each shall be paid by the independent contractor; and (C) A firearm and less than lethal use of force course. To maintain firearm proficiency, the independent contractor must complete yearly training in firearm and less than lethal use of force course. (5) Has either been honorably discharged from the United States armed services or is retired from his or her employment as a state trooper, municipal police officer, deputy sheriff, or federal law-enforcement officer;(6) Is current in any obligation, including taxes, to the state of West Virginia; and (7) Any other requirements imposed by the county school board which may include, but are not limited to, a pre-employment written examination and a pre-employment polygraph exam. A county school board may also require an independent contractor to carry appropriate liability insurance at his or her expense. (e) Exclusions from participation. — Any of the following shall preclude an independent contractor from participation as a West Virginia Guardian: (1) A dishonorable or less than honorable discharge from the United States armed services; (2) Having not retired from service as a state trooper, municipal police officer, or deputy sheriff; (3) Having not retired from service as a federal law-enforcement officer;(4) Credible evidence of illegal drug use by the independent contractor in the preceding five-year period; (5) A disqualifying criminal offense, which shall include, but is not limited to: (A) Domestic violence as set forth in §61-2-28; (B) Driving under the influence as set forth in §17C-5-2; (C) Child abuse as set forth in §61-8D-1 et seq.; or(D) Unlawful manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver any controlled substance as set forth in §60A-4-1 et seq.; or(E) Any other misdemeanor or felony conviction deemed exclusionary for contracting with the independent contractor by the county school board. (f) Liability. — A county school board may not be held civilly liable or be criminally prosecuted for any action of a West Virginia Guardian acting within the scope of the duties for which their services were contracted unless the county school board can be shown to be grossly negligent or committed willful misconduct.(g) Miscellaneous. — (1) In contracting for the services set forth in this section, county school boards are not  subject to the purchasing requirements set forth in §5A-3-1 et seq. (2) Nothing in this section requires a county board of education to contract with a West Virginia Guardian. Participation by a county of board of education is voluntary and subject to the availability of county funds. Any county board of education that opts to participate shall do so at its own expense. The provisions of this section place no obligation for the state to appropriate money for the purposes set forth in this section.(3) As an independent contractor, a West Virginia Guardian is not eligible for participation in the public employee insurance plan, workers' compensation, additional state retirement credited to employment as a West Virginia Guardian, or any other state-sponsored or state-offered benefit plan.